Illinois, session 104th, HB2743.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Salaries Act is amended by changing Section 51 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 290/1)  (from Ch. 53, par. 1)7    Sec. 1. There shall be allowed and paid an annual salary in 8lieu of all other salaries, fees, perquisites, benefit of 9compensation in any form whatsoever, to each of the officers 10herein named, the following respectively:11    (1) For terms beginning before January 9, 2023: 12            To the Governor, a salary set by the Compensation 13        Review Board, together with the use and occupancy of 14        the executive mansion.15            To the Lieutenant Governor, a salary set by the 16        Compensation Review Board.17            To the Secretary of State, a salary set by the 18        Compensation Review Board.19            To the Comptroller, a salary set by the 20        Compensation Review Board.21            To the Treasurer, a salary set by the Compensation 22        Review Board.23            To the Attorney General, a salary set by the   HB2743- 2 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1        Compensation Review Board.2    (2) For terms beginning on or after January 9, 2023: 3            To the Governor, a salary of $205,700 or as set by 4        the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater, 5        together with the use and occupancy of the executive 6        mansion.7            To the Lieutenant Governor, a salary of $160,900 8        or as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever 9        is greater.10            To the Secretary of State, a salary of $183,300 or 11        as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 12        greater.13            To the Comptroller, a salary of $160,900 or as set 14        by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 15        greater.16            To the Treasurer, a salary of $160,900 or as set by 17        the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater.18            To the Attorney General, a salary of $183,300 or 19        as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 20        greater. 21(Source: P.A. 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.) 22    Section 10. The General Assembly Compensation Act is 23amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 24    (25 ILCS 115/1)  (from Ch. 63, par. 14)  HB2743- 3 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1    Sec. 1. Each member of the General Assembly shall receive 2an annual salary of $28,000 or as set by the Compensation 3Review Board, whichever is greater. Beginning with the 103rd 4General Assembly, each member of the General Assembly shall 5receive an annual salary of $85,000 or as set by the 6Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. The following 7named officers, committee chairmen and committee minority 8spokesmen shall receive additional amounts per year for their 9services as such officers, committee chairmen and committee 10minority spokesmen respectively, as set by the Compensation 11Review Board or, as follows, whichever is greater: Beginning 12the second Wednesday in January 1989, the Speaker and the 13minority leader of the House of Representatives and the 14President and the minority leader of the Senate, $16,000 each; 15the majority leader in the House of Representatives $13,500; 5 16assistant majority leaders and 5 assistant minority leaders in 17the Senate, $12,000 each; 6 assistant majority leaders and 6 18assistant minority leaders in the House of Representatives, 19$10,500 each; 2 Deputy Majority leaders in the House of 20Representatives $11,500 each; and 2 Deputy Minority leaders in 21the House of Representatives, $11,500 each; the majority 22caucus chairman and minority caucus chairman in the Senate, 23$12,000 each; and beginning the second Wednesday in January, 241989, the majority conference chairman and the minority 25conference chairman in the House of Representatives, $10,500 26each; beginning the second Wednesday in January, 1989, the   HB2743- 4 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1chairman and minority spokesman of each standing committee of 2the Senate, except the Rules Committee, the Committee on 3Committees, and the Committee on Assignment of Bills, $6,000 4each; and beginning the second Wednesday in January, 1989, the 5chairman and minority spokesman of each standing and select 6committee of the House of Representatives, $6,000 each; and 7beginning fiscal year 2020, the majority leader in the Senate, 8an amount equal to the majority leader in the House. For any 9General Assembly in which the majority party in the House of 10Representatives has 71 or more elected Representatives, the 11majority party shall have one additional majority officer who 12shall have the title of speaker pro tempore and who shall 13receive an amount equal to the majority leader in the House and 14one majority officer who shall receive an amount equal to an 15assistant majority leader in the House of Representatives. For 16any General Assembly in which the majority party in the Senate 17has 36 or more elected Senators, the majority party shall have 18one additional majority officer who shall receive an amount 19equal to the majority leader in the House and one majority 20officer who shall receive an amount equal to an assistant 21majority leader in the Senate. A member who serves in more than 22one position as an officer, committee chairman, or committee 23minority spokesman shall receive only one additional amount 24based on the position paying the highest additional amount. 25Prior to the 103rd General Assembly, the compensation provided 26for in this Section to be paid per year to members of the   HB2743- 5 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1General Assembly, including the additional sums payable per 2year to officers of the General Assembly shall be paid in 12 3equal monthly installments. The first such installment is 4payable on January 31, 1977. All subsequent equal monthly 5installments are payable on the last working day of the month. 6Prior to the 103rd General Assembly, a member who has held 7office any part of a month is entitled to compensation for an 8entire month.9    Beginning with the 103rd General Assembly, the 10compensation provided for in this Section to be paid per year 11to members of the General Assembly, including additional sums 12payable per year to officers of the General Assembly, shall be 13paid bi-monthly. Members who resign before completing the 14entire term in office shall be compensated on a prorated 15basis. Members completing the term of a vacancy shall be 16compensated on a prorated basis. 17    Mileage shall be paid at the rate of 20 cents per mile 18before January 9, 1985, and at the mileage allowance rate in 19effect under regulations promulgated pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 205707(b)(2) beginning January 9, 1985, for the number of actual 21highway miles necessarily and conveniently traveled by the 22most feasible route to be present upon convening of the 23sessions of the General Assembly by such member in each and 24every trip during each session in going to and returning from 25the seat of government, to be computed by the Comptroller. A 26member traveling by public transportation for such purposes,   HB2743- 6 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1however, shall be paid his actual cost of that transportation 2instead of on the mileage rate if his cost of public 3transportation exceeds the amount to which he would be 4entitled on a mileage basis. No member may be paid, whether on 5a mileage basis or for actual costs of public transportation, 6for more than one such trip for each week the General Assembly 7is actually in session. Each member shall also receive an 8allowance of $36 per day for lodging and meals while in 9attendance at sessions of the General Assembly before January 109, 1985; beginning January 9, 1985, such food and lodging 11allowance shall be equal to the amount per day permitted to be 12deducted for such expenses under the Internal Revenue Code; 13however, beginning May 31, 1995, no allowance for food and 14lodging while in attendance at sessions is authorized for 15periods of time after the last day in May of each calendar 16year, except (i) if the General Assembly is convened in 17special session by either the Governor or the presiding 18officers of both houses, as provided by subsection (b) of 19Section 5 of Article IV of the Illinois Constitution or (ii) if 20the General Assembly is convened to consider bills vetoed, 21item vetoed, reduced, or returned with specific 22recommendations for change by the Governor as provided in 23Section 9 of Article IV of the Illinois Constitution. For 24fiscal year 2011 and for session days in fiscal years 2012, 252013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019 only (i) the 26allowance for lodging and meals is $111 per day and (ii)   HB2743- 7 -LRB104 07177 BDA 17214 b1mileage for automobile travel shall be reimbursed at a rate of 2$0.39 per mile. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 4contrary, beginning in fiscal year 2012, travel reimbursement 5for General Assembly members on non-session days shall be 6calculated using the guidelines set forth by the Legislative 7Travel Control Board, except that fiscal year 2012, 2013, 82014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019 mileage reimbursement 9is set at a rate of $0.39 per mile. 10    If a member dies having received only a portion of the 11amount payable as compensation, the unpaid balance shall be 12paid to the surviving spouse of such member, or, if there be 13none, to the estate of such member.14(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-664, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.)